Utah statutes.
63M-1-303.   Board duties and powers.
(1)  The board shall:
(a)  promote and encourage the economic, commercial, financial, industrial,
agricultural, and civic welfare of the state;
(b)  do all lawful acts for the development, attraction, and retention of
businesses, industries, and commerce within the state;
(c)  promote and encourage the expansion and retention of businesses,
industries, and commerce located in the state;
(d)  support the efforts of local government and regional nonprofit economic
development organizations to encourage expansion or retention of businesses,
industries, and commerce located in the state;
(e)  do other acts not specifically enumerated in this chapter, if the acts
are for the betterment of the economy of the state;
(f)  work in conjunction with companies and individuals located or doing
business within the state to secure favorable rates, fares, tolls, charges,
and classification for transportation of persons or property by:
(i)  railroad;
(ii)  motor carrier; or
(iii)  other common carriers;
(g)  recommend policies, priorities, and objectives to the office regarding
the assistance, retention, or recruitment of business, industries, and
commerce in the state; and
(h)  recommend how any money or program administered by the office or its
divisions for the assistance, retention, or recruitment of businesses,
industries, and commerce in the state shall be administered, so that the money
or program is equitably available to all areas of the state unless federal or
state law requires or authorizes the geographic location of a recipient of the
money or program to be considered in the distribution of the money or
administration of the program.
(2)  The board may:
(a)  in furtherance of the authority granted under Subsection (1)(f), appear
as a party litigant on behalf of individuals or companies located or doing
business within the state in proceedings before regulatory commissions of the
state, other states, or the federal government having jurisdiction over such
matters; and
(b)  make, amend, or repeal rules for the conduct of its business consistent
with this part and in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act.
(3) (a)  Subject to Subsection (3)(b), when monies are appropriated or
otherwise made available to the office by the Legislature for the purchase of
a contract for the sale of land, the board, with the approval of the state
treasurer, may purchase the contract if the board makes a finding that the
purchase of the contract promotes a statewide public interest such as
promoting ease of interstate or intrastate travel or advancing economic
development.
(b) (i)  As used in this Subsection (3)(b), "net projected debt service cost"
means the monies projected to be necessary to pay bond issuance costs for a
general obligation bond and to make any interest payments for that general
obligation bond less the projected investment earnings from the state's
investment of that bond's proceeds, if any.
(ii)  When some or all of the monies made available by the Legislature to
purchase a contract for the sale of land are provided from the proceeds from
the issuance of one or more general obligation bonds, if the board and state
treasurer decide to purchase the contract, the board and state treasurer shall
purchase the contract at a price discounted by an amount equal to the total
net projected debt service cost for those bonds.
(iii)  The State Bonding Commission shall certify the total net projected debt
service cost to the board and the state treasurer.
(iv)  In purchasing a contract, the board and state treasurer may:
(A)  purchase the contract with a single payment; or
(B)  arrange to have the contract placed in escrow pending the final payment
on the contract and make multiple payments on the contract according to a
schedule that is negotiated with the holder of the contract and included as
part of the contract.
(c)  Before purchasing a contract, the board and the state treasurer shall:
(i)  contract with a qualified person or entity to prepare a report evaluating
the purchaser of the land;
(ii)  ensure that the report evaluates:
(A)  the purchaser's financial ability to pay the money to complete the
purchase on the date that the final payment is due under the contract;
(B)  whether or not the security underlying the contract is adequate to
protect the state if the purchaser defaults;
(C)  the purchaser's balance sheet and general credit-worthiness;
(D)  environmental issues affecting the property under federal or state law;
and
(E)  any other items that will assist the board and the state treasurer in
determining whether or not to purchase the contract;
(iii)  ensure that the state has or will have a properly perfected security
interest in, title to, or a deed in escrow for, the property that is the
subject of the purchase; and
(iv)  after reviewing the report, evaluating the state's security in case of a
default on the contract, and considering the terms of the proposed contract,
determine whether or not to purchase the contract.
(d)  The board and the state treasurer may not purchase a contract under this
Subsection (3) if the date of the last payment owed by the land purchaser
under the contract is more than seven years from the date that the board
purchases the contract.
